Missouri, session 2026, SB1739.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 407.3700, to read as
follows:
407.3700. 1. A person shall not contact a property
owner more than one time in a calendar year with an
unsolicited offer to buy the property owner's real property.
2. The unsolicited offer to buy real property under
subsection 1 of this section shall include, but is not
limited to, any communication made through a telephone call,
text message, email, mail, facsimile transmission, or any
other form of communication.
3. When a person contacts a property owner with an
unsolicited offer to buy the property owner's real property
under this section, prior to making the solicitation, the
person shall provide the property owner with:
(1) The person's legal name;
(2) The person's address;
(3) The person's telephone number where the person may
be contacted; and

SB 1739 2
(4) The person's email address where the person may be
contacted.
4. Communication between a person and a property owner
shall not be considered an unsolicited offer to buy real
property, if such communication is part of an ongoing
negotiation to acquire real property, until the property
owner states that the property owner does not wish to
continue the negotiations, or, in the case of negotiations
occurring through text message, writes that the property
owner does not wish to continue negotiations.
5. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions
of this section. Violations of this section may be reported
to the attorney general. Within twenty days of receiving a
report for any violation of this section, the attorney
general shall send a written notice to the property owner
that the attorney general is conducting an investigation as
to whether a violation occurred. After the investigation is
completed, the attorney general shall send a second written
notice to the property owner describing the findings of the
investigation. The second written notice shall also include
information describing how the property owner may be placed
on the no-call list pursuant to sections 407.1101 and
407.1110.
6. If the attorney general believes that a violation
occurred, the attorney general shall commence a civil action
in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds
that a violation occurred, the court may grant injunctive
relief, civil penalties, damages, attorney fees, and any
such other relief the court finds appropriate. A civil
penalty shall not exceed two thousand dollars per violation.
✓